nursery/apertium-nld-fry/apertium-nld-fry.fry.dix
    <pardef n="jier__n_nt">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ren</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="doar__n_mf">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ren</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="koker__n_nt">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>s</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="sus__n_mf">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sen</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="fi/ich__n_mf">
      <e><p><l>ich</l><r>ich<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gen</l><r>ich<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- SECTION: Proper nouns -->

    <pardef n="Fryslân__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Marie__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Jan__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Adjectives -->

    <pardef n="/goed__adj_sint">
      <e>       <p><l>goed</l><r>goed<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pred"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>goede</l><r>goed<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="attr"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>goeds</l><r>goed<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="par"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>better</l><r>goed<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="attr"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>better</l><r>goed<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="pred"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>betters</l><r>goed<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="par"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>bêste</l><r>goed<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="attr"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>bêst</l><r>goed<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="pred"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="âld__adj_sint">
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pred"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>e</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="attr"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>s</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="par"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>er</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="attr"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>er</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="pred"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ers</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="par"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ste</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="attr"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>st</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="pred"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="grut__adj_sint">
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pred"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>te</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="attr"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>s</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="par"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ter</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="attr"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ter</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="pred"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ters</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="par"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ste</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="attr"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>st</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="pred"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="lyts__adj_sint">
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pred"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>e</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="attr"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="par"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ter</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="attr"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ter</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="pred"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ters</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="par"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>te</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="attr"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>t</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="pred"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="kâld__adj_sint">
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pred"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>e</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="attr"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>s</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="par"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>er</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="attr"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>er</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="pred"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ers</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="par"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>este</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="attr"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>est</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="pred"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Adverbs -->

    <pardef n="wêr__adv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="tige__preadv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="preadv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="temûk__adv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Verbs -->

    <pardef n="/wêze__vbser">
      <e><p><l>wêze</l><r>wêze<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>wêzen</l><r>wêze<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf2"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>west</l><r>wêze<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>wêzend</l><r>wêze<s n="vbser"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>wêzende</l><r>wêze<s n="vbser"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>bin</l><r>wêze<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bist</l><r>wêze<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>is</l><r>wêze<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>binne</l><r>wêze<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>wie</l><r>wêze<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>wiest</l><r>wêze<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>wie</l><r>wêze<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>wienen</l><r>wêze<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>wês</l><r>wêze<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="h/awwe__vbhaver">
      <e><p><l>awwe</l><r>awwe<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>awwen</l><r>awwe<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="inf2"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>a</l><r>awwe<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ast</l><r>awwe<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>at</l><r>awwe<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>awwe</l><r>awwe<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ie</l><r>awwe<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iest</l><r>awwe<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ie</l><r>awwe<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iene</l><r>awwe<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ienen</l><r>awwe<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="beuker"><i>beuker</i><par n="koker__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="famke"><i>famke</i><par n="koker__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="biezem"><i>biezem</i><par n="koker__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="breedteken"><i>breedteken</i><par n="koker__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="bruor"><i>bruor</i><par n="doar__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="doar"><i>doar</i><par n="doar__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="fiich"><i>fi</i><par n="fi/ich__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="fuortrinbultsje"><i>fuortrinbultsje</i><par n="koker__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="jier"><i>jier</i><par n="jier__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="kjitten"><i>kjitten</i><par n="koker__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="koker"><i>koker</i><par n="koker__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="kriich"><i>kri</i><par n="fi/ich__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="leavehearsbistke"><i>leavehearsbistke</i><par n="koker__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="sus"><i>sus</i><par n="sus__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="tekken"><i>tekken</i><par n="koker__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="wrâldkriich"><i>wrâldkri</i><par n="fi/ich__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="wytsing"><i>wytsing</i><par n="koker__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="wûnder"><i>wûnder</i><par n="koker__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ûntploffing"><i>ûntploffing</i><par n="koker__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="Fryslân"><i>Fryslân</i><par n="Fryslân__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Sina"><i>Sina</i><par n="Fryslân__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Peking"><i>Peking</i><par n="Fryslân__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Nederlân"><i>Nederlân</i><par n="Fryslân__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Dútslân"><i>Dútslân</i><par n="Fryslân__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Ingelân"><i>Ingelân</i><par n="Fryslân__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Hollân"><i>Hollân</i><par n="Fryslân__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Estlân"><i>Estlân</i><par n="Fryslân__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Finlân"><i>Finlân</i><par n="Fryslân__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Grikelân"><i>Grikelân</i><par n="Fryslân__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Yslân"><i>Yslân</i><par n="Fryslân__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Laplân"><i>Laplân</i><par n="Fryslân__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Letlân"><i>Letlân</i><par n="Fryslân__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Nij-Seelân"><i>Nij-Seelân</i><par n="Fryslân__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Noard-Ierlân"><i>Noard-Ierlân</i><par n="Fryslân__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Ruslân"><i>Ruslân</i><par n="Fryslân__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Skotlân"><i>Skotlân</i><par n="Fryslân__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Switserlân"><i>Switserlân</i><par n="Fryslân__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Marie"><i>Marie</i><par n="Marie__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Jan"><i>Jan</i><par n="Jan__np"/></e>
    <e lm="goed"><i></i><par n="/goed__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="âld"><i>âld</i><par n="âld__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="aardich"><i>aardich</i><par n="âld__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="bliid"><i>bliid</i><par n="âld__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="kâld"><i>kâld</i><par n="kâld__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="waarm"><i>waarm</i><par n="kâld__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="grut"><i>grut</i><par n="grut__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="lyts"><i>lyts</i><par n="lyts__adj_sint"/></e>
    <e lm="wêr"><i>wêr</i><par n="wêr__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="hawar"><i>hawar</i><par n="wêr__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="wolno"><i>wolno</i><par n="wêr__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="tige"><i>tige</i><par n="tige__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="temûk"><i>temûk</i><par n="temûk__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="altyd"><i>altyd</i><par n="temûk__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="no"><i>no</i><par n="temûk__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ek"><i>ek</i><par n="temûk__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="nea"><i>nea</i><par n="temûk__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="noait"><i>noait</i><par n="temûk__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="stadich"><i>stadich</i><par n="temûk__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="bûten"><i>bûten</i><par n="temûk__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="juster"><i>juster</i><par n="temûk__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="fansels"><i>fansels</i><par n="temûk__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="gau"><i>gau</i><par n="temûk__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="dan"><i>dan</i><par n="temûk__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="dus"><i>dus</i><par n="temûk__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="tegearre"><i>tegearre</i><par n="temûk__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="rûnom"><i>rûnom</i><par n="temûk__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="wer"><i>wer</i><par n="temûk__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="alwer"><i>alwer</i><par n="temûk__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="jit"><i>jit</i><par n="temûk__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="om"><i>om</i><par n="temûk__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="meiïnoar"><i>meiïnoar</i><par n="temûk__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="wêze"><i></i><par n="/wêze__vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="hawwe"><i>h</i><par n="h/awwe__vbhaver"/></e>
